Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. Operations.

Sec. 06.40.090.
Misleading statements prohibited; disclosure of interest rate.

A person may not advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast, in any manner, any statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions for the lending of money, credit, goods, or things in action which is false, misleading, or deceptive.

The licensee or lender shall state the interest rate charged in a premium finance agreement fully and clearly as an annual percentage rate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For advertising, see 3 AAC 7, art. 3.

Sec. 06.40.100.
Record keeping; examination of records; report.

A licensee shall maintain records of its premium finance transactions, including the insurance agents through which the licensee provides loans to residents of this state, and the records shall be open to examination and investigation by the commissioner at the office of the licensee. All records pertaining to insurance contracts financed by state residents shall be maintained or readily available in the licensee’s office. The commissioner may, at any reasonable time, require the licensee to bring records pertaining to premium finance agreements to the commissioner’s office for examination. The expenses incurred by the department in conducting an examination shall be charged to and paid by the licensee in accordance with AS

06.01.010

.

A licensee shall preserve its records of premium finance transactions, including cards used in a card system, for at least three years after making the final entry relating to any premium finance agreement. The preservation of records in photographic form constitutes compliance with this requirement.

Each licensee shall, on or before March 15 of each year, file a report with the department containing information as the department may reasonably require concerning the business and operations during the preceding calendar year of each licensed place of business conducted by the licensee. The report shall be made under oath, shall be in the form prescribed by the department, and shall be kept available as a public record.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 3 AAC 7, art. 2.

For loans, payments, and refunds, see 3 AAC 7, art. 4.

Sec. 06.40.110.
Contents of premium finance agreement; deficiency balances.

A premium finance agreement must

be dated, signed by the borrower, and the printed portion of it shall be in at least eight-point type;

contain the name and place of business of the insurance agent negotiating the related insurance policy, the name and residence or the place of business of the borrower as specified by the borrower, the name and place of business of the licensee to which payments are to be made, an identification of the insurance policy involved, and the amount of the premium charged for it; and

set out the following items where applicable:

the total amount of the premiums;

the amount of the down payment;

the principal balance (the difference between (A) and (B) of this paragraph);

the annual percentage rate of interest; and

the number of payments required, the amount of each payment expressed in dollars, and the due date or period of it.

The items set out in (a)(3) of this section do not need to be stated in the sequence or order in which they appear in (a) of this section, and additional items may be included to explain the computations made in determining the amount to be paid by the insured.

The repayment schedule relating to dwelling fire, homeowner, private passenger automobile, boats not used for commercial purposes, owner-occupied mobile homes, and fire insurance policies covering owner-occupied multiple unit dwellings for four families or less shall be such that the total amount due the licensee at any time does not exceed the unearned premium on the policy being financed at that time. A deficiency balance may not be established or collected from the borrower. This section does not preclude the licensee from establishing or collecting a deficiency balance to the extent the insurer offsets unearned premiums on the policy financed by premiums earned by reason of endorsements to that same policy not paid for by the insured or financed by the licensee.

The licensee or the insurance agent shall deliver to the borrower, or mail to the borrower at the address shown in the agreement, a complete copy of the agreement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For license applications, see 3 AAC 7, art. 1.

Sec. 06.40.120.
Service charge; interest rate; prepayment.

A premium finance company may not charge, contract for, receive, or collect a service charge other than as permitted by this chapter.

The service charge is to be computed on the balance of the premiums due, after subtracting the down payment made by the borrower in accordance with the premium finance agreement, from the effective date of the insurance coverage for which the premiums are being advanced, to and including the date when the final payment of the premium finance agreement is payable.

The service charge may not exceed interest at the nominal annual rate of 15 percent plus an additional charge of $10 per premium finance agreement which need not be refunded upon cancellation or prepayment. However, any borrower may prepay a premium finance agreement in full at any time before the due date of the final payment and in that event the unearned service charge shall be refunded. The amount of any refund shall be calculated in accordance with regulations adopted by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For loans, payments, and refunds, see 3 AAC 7, art. 4.

Sec. 06.40.130.
Delinquency charge; separate financing.

A premium finance agreement may provide for the payment by the borrower of a delinquency charge for any payment that is in default for a period of 10 days or more. The charge may be made for each month or fraction of a month that the payment is in default. The amount of the charge may be a minimum of $1 and as a maximum shall be subject to the following limits:

for delinquent payments of less than $250, five percent of the payment or $5, whichever is less; or

for delinquent payments of $250 or more, two percent of the payment.

A borrower has the option to separate the financing of the premiums for one insurance policy from a premium finance agreement by requesting in writing that the premium finance company provide that service and by paying a $10 separate charge.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For loans, payments, and refunds, see 3 AAC 7, art. 4.

Sec. 06.40.140.
Cancellation of policy.

When a premium finance agreement contains a power of attorney enabling the licensee to cancel the insurance policy listed in the agreement, the insurance policy may not be cancelled by the licensee unless the cancellation is effectuated under this section.

The licensee shall give not less than 10 days’ written notice to the borrower, by mailing by certified mail or documented by an affidavit of mailing, of the licensee’s intent to cancel the insurance policy unless the default is cured within that 10-day period. A copy of the notice shall also be mailed by certified mail or documented by an affidavit of mailing to the insurance agent indicated on the premium finance agreement.

After expiration of the 10-day period specified in (b) of this section, the licensee may, in the name of the borrower, cancel the insurance policy by mailing by certified mail or documented by an affidavit of mailing to the insurer a notice of cancellation. The insurance policy shall be cancelled as if the notice of cancellation had been submitted by the borrower, but without requiring the return of the insurance policy. The licensee shall also mail by certified mail or documented by an affidavit of mailing a notice of cancellation to the borrower at the borrower’s last-known address and to the insurance agent indicated on the premium finance agreement.

All statutory, regulatory, and contractual restrictions providing that the insurance policy may not be cancelled unless notice is given to a governmental agency, mortgagee, or other third party shall apply where cancellation is effected under this section. The insurer shall give the prescribed notice on behalf of itself or the borrower to any governmental agency, mortgagee, or other third party on or before the fifth business day after the date it receives the notice of cancellation from the licensee and shall determine the effective date of cancellation, taking into consideration the number of days’ notice required to complete the cancellation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, made stylistic changes in the second sentence of (d).

Sec. 06.40.150.
Return of unearned premiums.

If a financed insurance policy is cancelled, and provided the insurer has been notified of the assignment of interest of the insured to the licensee, the insurer shall, within 60 days after the effective date of cancellation, take the steps that are necessary to have any gross unearned premiums that are due under the insurance policy returned to the licensee for the account of the borrower if the licensee has complied with the notice provisions of AS

06.40.140(b)

.

If the crediting of return premiums to the account of the borrower results in a surplus over the amount due from the borrower, the licensee shall refund the excess to the borrower; however, a refund is not required if it amounts to less than $1.

History.

(§ 1 ch 170 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For loans, payments, and refunds, see 3 AAC 7, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), substituted “the insurer shall, within 60 days after the effective date of cancellation” for “the insurer, within 60 days of the effective date of cancellation shall” and made related changes.